Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-208
Agriculture or agricultural enterprise, defined.

Agriculture or agricultural enterprise shall mean the real and personal property constituting farms and ranches.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 9.